dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="smet/te__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tede</l>      <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tede</l>      <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tende</l>     <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tete</l>      <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tete</l>      <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r>te<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="røk/je__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lø/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="endefrem__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mere</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>meste</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tv/inge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ingende</l>   <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungen</l>     <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unget</l>     <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unget</l>     <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungne</l>     <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungne</l>     <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kry__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gagns__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="velt/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="idéhistorisk__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/yve__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>øyen</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvende</l>    <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="avtvinge">        <i>avtv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="framtvinge">      <i>framtv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="endefrem">        <i>endefrem</i><par n="endefrem__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bentfrem">        <i>bentfrem</i><par n="endefrem__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beintfram">       <i>beintfram</i><par n="endefrem__adj"/></e>
<e lm="betvinge">        <i>betv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gagns">           <i>gagns</i><par n="gagns__adj"/></e>
<e lm="breste">          <i>brest</i><par n="velt/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fremtvinge">      <i>fremtv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="idéhistorisk">    <i>idéhistorisk</i><par n="idéhistorisk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="følgje">          <i>følg</i><par n="røk/je__adj"/></e>
<e lm="småspringe">      <i>småspr</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skrue">           <i>skru</i><par n="lø/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="springe">         <i>spr</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="velte">           <i>velt</i><par n="velt/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sprette">         <i>spret</i><par n="smet/te__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tiltvinge">       <i>tiltv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="undertvinge">     <i>undertv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="svelte">          <i>svelt</i><par n="velt/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smette">          <i>smet</i><par n="smet/te__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sprøe">           <i>sprø</i><par n="lø/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skvette">         <i>skvet</i><par n="smet/te__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvinge">          <i>tv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="løe">             <i>lø</i><par n="lø/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kry">             <i>kry</i><par n="kry__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lyve">            <i>l</i><par n="l/yve__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påtvinge">        <i>påtv</i><par n="tv/inge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="røkje">           <i>røk</i><par n="røk/je__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rettfrem">        <i>rettfrem</i><par n="endefrem__adj"/></e>
<e lm="likefrem">        <i>likefrem</i><par n="endefrem__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rettfram">        <i>rettfram</i><par n="endefrem__adj"/></e>
<e lm="likefram">        <i>likefram</i><par n="endefrem__adj"/></e>
